Indiana, session 2026, HB1319.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-15-2-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) The authority may do the following:
(1) Fix, revise, charge, and collect tolls for the use of each toll
road project by any person, partnership, association, limited
liability company, or corporation desiring the use of any part
thereof, including the right-of-way adjoining the paved portion
and for placing thereon telephone, telegraph, electric light, or
power lines.
(2) Fix the terms, conditions, and rates of charge for such use,
including assessments for the failure to pay required tolls, subject,
however, to the state's police power.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (m), collect tolls, user fees,
or other charges through manual or nonmanual methods,
including, but not limited to, automatic vehicle identification
systems, electronic toll collection systems, and, to the extent
permitted by law, including rules adopted by the authority under
2026 IN 1319—LS 6914/DI 137


section 17.2(a)(10) of this chapter, global positioning systems and
photo or video based toll collection or toll collection enforcement
systems.
(4) Adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 authorizing the use of and
establishing procedures for the implementation of the collection
of user fees by electronic or other nonmanual means under
subdivision (3).
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), no toll or charge shall be made
by the authority under this section or under a public-private agreement
entered into under IC 8-15.5 for:
(1) the operation of temporary lodging facilities located upon or
adjacent to any project, nor may the authority itself operate or
gratuitously permit the operation of such temporary lodging
facilities by other persons without any toll or charge; or
(2) placing in, on, along, over, or under such project, such
telephone, telegraph, electric light or power lines, equipment, or
facilities as may be necessary to serve establishments located on
the project or as may be necessary to interconnect any public
utility facilities on one (1) side of the toll road project with those
on the other side.
(c) All contracts executed by the authority shall be preserved in the
principal office of the authority.
(d) In the case of a toll road project that is not leased to the
department under IC 8-9.5-8-7, the tolls shall be fixed and adjusted for
each toll road project so that the aggregate of the tolls from the project,
together with other revenues that are available to the authority without
prior restriction or encumbrance, will at least be adequate to pay:
(1) the cost of operating, maintaining, and repairing the toll road
project, including major repairs, replacements, and
improvements;
(2) the principal of and the interest on bonds issued in connection
with the toll road project, as the principal and interest becomes
due and payable, including any reserve or sinking fund required
for the project; and
(3) the payment of principal of and interest on toll road bonds
issued by the authority in connection with any other toll road
project, including any reserve or sinking fund required for the
project, but only to the extent that the authority provides by
resolution and subject to the provisions of any trust agreement
relating to the project.
(e) Not less than one (1) year before the date that final payment of
all such bonds, interest, and reimbursement is expected by the
2026 IN 1319—LS 6914/DI 137


chairman of the authority to be completed, the chairman shall notify the
state budget committee in writing of the expected date of final
payment.
(f) Such tolls shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any
other commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state.
(g) The tolls, rents, and all other revenues derived by the authority
from the toll road project, except those received in accordance with a
public-private agreement under IC 8-15.5, shall be used as follows:
(1) To pay the cost of operating, maintaining, and repairing the
toll road project, including major repairs, replacements, and
improvements, to the extent that those costs are not paid out of
other funds.
(2) To the extent provided for in the resolution authorizing the
issuance of bonds under this chapter or in the trust agreement
securing the bonds, to pay:
(A) the principal of and interest on any bonds as the principal
and interest become due; or
(B) the redemption price or purchase price of the bonds retired
by call or purchase.
(3) Except as prohibited by the resolution authorizing the issuance
of bonds under this chapter or the trust agreement securing them,
for any purpose relating to any toll road project, including the
subject toll road project, as the authority provides by resolution.
(h) Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement by which a pledge
is created needs to be filed or recorded except in the records of the
authority.
(i) The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of any sinking
fund shall be subject to the provisions of any resolution or resolutions
authorizing the issuance of any bonds or of any trust agreement. Except
as may otherwise be provided in this chapter or in any resolution or any
trust agreement, any sinking fund shall be a fund for all bonds without
distinction or priority of one over another, subject, however, to such
priorities as may arise from prior pledges.
(j) In the case of a toll road project that is leased to the department
under IC 8-9.5-8-8, the lease must require that the department fix tolls
for the toll road project that comply with IC 8-9.5-8-8(c)(6).
(k) User fees (as defined in IC 8-15.5-2-10) for a toll road project
that is subject to a public-private agreement under IC 8-15.5 shall be
set in accordance with IC 8-15.5-7.
(l) The amount of a toll must be invoiced to a driver not later than
one (1) year after the date the driver incurs the toll.
(m) The department must establish and implement an electronic
2026 IN 1319—LS 6914/DI 137


or nonmanual tolling program as the sole means for charging and
collecting user fees as follows:
(1) For a toll road project that is constructed after June 30,
2026.
(2) For a tollway that is in existence on July 1, 2026, the
electronic or nonmanual tolling program must be fully
implemented not later than December 31, 2027.
SECTION 2. IC 8-15.5-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.208-2019,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. A public-private agreement entered into under
this article must provide for the following:
(1) The original term of the public-private agreement, which may
not exceed seventy-five (75) years.
(2) Provisions for a:
(A) lease, franchise, or license of the project and the real
property owned by the authority upon which the project is
located or is to be located; or
(B) management agreement or other contract to operate the
project and the real property owned by the authority upon
which the project is located or is to be located;
for a predetermined period. The public-private agreement must
provide for ownership of all improvements and real property by
the authority in the name of the state or by a governmental entity,
or both.
(3) Monitoring of the operator's maintenance practices by the
authority and the taking of actions by the authority that it
considers appropriate to ensure that the project is properly
maintained.
(4) The basis upon which user fees that may be collected by the
operator, as determined under this article, are established.
(5) Compliance with applicable state and federal laws and local
ordinances.
(6) Filing by the operator, on a periodic basis, of appropriate
financial statements in a form acceptable to the authority.
(7) Grounds for termination of the public-private agreement by
the authority or the operator.
(8) The date of termination of the operator's authority and duties
under this article.
(9) Procedures for amendment of the agreement.
(10) Provisions requiring the completion of all environmental
analyses of the project required by state and federal law in the
manner and at the times required by the appropriate state and
2026 IN 1319—LS 6914/DI 137


federal agencies.
(11) An expedited method for resolving disputes between or
among the authority, the parties to the public-private agreement,
and units of local government that contain any part of the project,
as required by IC 8-15.5-10-8.
(12) This subdivision applies only to a public-private agreement
entered into after June 30, 2019. The agreement must provide for
payment and performance bonds as follows:
(A) For a payment bond, an amount not less than one hundred
percent (100%) of the cost to design and construct the project.
(B) For a performance bond, an amount not less than fifty
percent (50%) of the cost to design and construct the project.
(13) This subdivision applies only to a public-private
agreement entered into, renewed, or amended after June 30,
2026. The agreement must include a provision requiring an
operator to establish and implement an electronic or
nonmanual tolling program as the sole means for charging
and collecting user fees, with a deadline for implementing the
program that is not later than two (2) years after the
agreement is entered into, renewed, or amended.
SECTION 3. IC 8-15.5-7-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2015,
SECTION 117, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A public-private agreement may:
(1) grant an operator a license or franchise to charge and collect
tolls or user fees for the use of the toll road project or facility
project;
(2) authorize the operator to adjust the user fees charged and
collected for the use of the toll road project or facility project, so
long as the amounts charged and collected by the operator do not
exceed the maximum amounts established by the authority under
section 1 of this chapter;
(3) provide that any adjustment by the operator permitted under
subdivision (2) may be based on such indices, methodologies, or
other factors as described in the public-private agreement or
section 1 of this chapter or as approved by the authority, as
applicable;
(4) except as provided in IC 8-15.5-5-2(13), authorize the
operator to charge and collect user fees through manual and
nonmanual methods, and for a toll road project may include, but
not be limited to, automatic vehicle identification systems,
electronic toll collection systems, and, to the extent permitted by
law, including rules adopted by the authority under
2026 IN 1319—LS 6914/DI 137


IC 8-15-2-17.2(a)(10), global positioning systems and photo or
video based toll collection or toll collection enforcement systems;
and
(5) authorize the collection of user fees charges by a third party.
2026 IN 1319—LS 6914/DI 137